Missouri, session 2026, HB2303.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 170, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 170.281, to read as follows:
170.281. 1. As used in this section, "personal finance" means a course consisting
of financial literacy and up-to-date tools, resources, and discipline necessary to succeed
in a personal and professional capacity in the current economy.
2. Any instruction regarding personal finance shall include, but is not limited to,
the following:
(1) Earning income and understanding paychecks;
(2) Budgeting and managing expenses;
(3) Saving and long-term financial planning;
(4) Banking and financial services;
(5) Understanding credit, loans, and interest;
(6) Responsible use of credit cards;
(7) Investing, retirement accounts, and compound interest;
(8) Fraud prevention and financial safety;
(9) Taxes and civic financial responsibilities;
(10) Understanding contracts and major purchases, including housing and
automobiles; and
(11) Insurance.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HBs 2303 & 2867 2
3. (1) The department of elementary and secondary education shall convene a
work group to develop and recommend academic performance standards relating to the
one-half unit of credit of personal finance required by the state board of education. The
work group shall include, but not be limited to:
(a) Educators providing instruction in personal finance;
(b) A representative from the department of elementary and secondary
education; and
(c) Up to two representatives from each of the following:
a. The banking industry;
b. Entrepreneurs in the business community;
c. Nonprofit organizations that focus on educating young professionals and
entrepreneurs;
d. The investment industry;
e. The student loan industry;
f. The retirement planning industry; and
g. The insurance industry.
(2) The total number of members of the work group shall be determined by the
department. At least twenty-five percent of the total shall be educators providing
instruction in personal finance.
4. The state board of education shall adopt and implement academic
performance standards relating to personal finance for the 2027-28 school year and
all subsequent school years, except that academic performance standards relating to
personal finance shall be reviewed every five years to determine if the performance
standards need to be updated to reflect trends and best practices in the current
economy.
5. (1) For the 2027-28 school year and all subsequent school years, each school
district shall require that after the completion of grade nine each student satisfactorily
completes such one-half unit of credit of personal finance before receiving a high school
diploma or certificate of graduation.
(2) A school district may elect to waive the requirements of subdivision (1) of this
subsection for a student who transfers from outside the state to a Missouri high school if
the student can furnish documentation deemed acceptable by the school district of the
student's successful completion of a substantially similar course of instruction.
(3) A school district may allow a student in grade nine to complete such one-half
unit of credit of personal finance if, on the recommendation of a school counselor,
completing such one-half unit of credit of personal finance is beneficial and appropriate
for such student's personal plan of study or career academic plan.

HCS HBs 2303 & 2867 3
6. The requirements of section 160.514 shall not apply to this section.
✔